Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4896.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 17001. (1) As used in this part:
(a) "Academic institution" means either of the following:
(i) A medical school approved by the board.
(ii) A hospital licensed under article 17 that meets all of the
following requirements:
(A) Was the sole sponsor or a co-sponsor, if each other co-
sponsor is either a medical school approved by the board or a
EMR H03791'25 (H-1) ev86py


hospital owned by the federal government and directly operated by
the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, of not less than
4 postgraduate education residency programs approved by the board
under section 17031(1) for not less than the 3 years immediately
preceding the date of an application for a limited license under
section 16182(2)(c) or an application for a full license under
section 17031(2), 17031(2)(a), if at least 1 of the residency
programs is in the specialty area of medical practice, or in a
specialty area that includes the subspecialty of medical practice,
in which the applicant for a limited license proposes to practice
or in which the applicant for a full license has practiced for the
hospital.
(B) Has spent not less than $2,000,000.00 for medical
education during each of the 3 years immediately preceding the date
of an application for a limited license under section 16182(2)(c)
or an application for a full license under section 17031(2).
17031(2)(a). As used in this sub-subparagraph, "medical education"
means the education of physicians and candidates for degrees or
licenses to become physicians, including, but not limited to,
physician staff, residents, interns, and medical students.
(b) "Electrodiagnostic studies" means the testing of
neuromuscular functions utilizing nerve conduction tests and needle
electromyography. It does not include the use of surface
electromyography.
(c) "Genetic counselor" means an individual who is licensed
under this part to engage in the practice of genetic counseling.
(d) "Medical care services" means those services within the
scope of practice of physicians who are licensed or authorized by
the board, department, except those services that the board
EMR H03791'25 (H-1) ev86py


prohibits are prohibited or otherwise restricts restricted within a
practice agreement or determines shall not be delegated by a
physician because a delegation would endanger the health and safety
of patients as provided for in section 17048(1).
(e) "Participating physician" means a physician, a physician
designated by a group of physicians under section 17049 to
represent that group, or a physician designated by a health
facility or agency under section 20174 to represent that health
facility or agency.
(f) "Physician" means an individual who is licensed or
authorized under this article to engage in the practice of
medicine.
(g) "Podiatrist" means an individual who is licensed under
this article to engage in the practice of podiatric medicine and
surgery.
(h) "Practice agreement" means an agreement described in
section 17047.
(i) "Practice as a physician's assistant" means the practice
of medicine with a participating physician under a practice
agreement.
(j) (i) "Practice of genetic counseling" means provision of
any of the following services:
(i) Obtaining and evaluating individual, family, and medical
histories to determine the genetic risk for genetic or medical
conditions or diseases in a client, the client's descendants, or
other family members of the client.
(ii) Discussing with a client the features, natural history,
means of diagnosis, genetic and environmental factors, and
management of the genetic risks of genetic or medical conditions or
EMR H03791'25 (H-1) ev86py


diseases.
(iii) Identifying and coordinating appropriate genetic
laboratory tests and other diagnostic studies for genetic
assessment of a client.
(iv) Integrating genetic laboratory test results and other
diagnostic studies with personal and family medical history to
assess and communicate a client's risk factors for genetic or
medical conditions or diseases.
(v) Explaining to a client the clinical implications of
genetic laboratory tests and other diagnostic studies and their
results.
(vi) Evaluating the responses of a client and the client's
family to a genetic or medical condition or disease or to the risk
of recurrence of that condition or disease and providing client-
centered counseling and anticipatory guidance.
(vii) Identifying and utilizing community resources that
provide medical, educational, financial, and psychosocial support
and advocacy to a client.
(viii) Providing written documentation of medical, genetic, and
counseling information for families of and health care
professionals of a client.
(k) (j) "Practice of medicine" means the diagnosis, treatment,
prevention, cure, or relieving of a human disease, ailment, defect,
complaint, or other physical or mental condition, by attendance,
advice, device, diagnostic test, or other means, or offering,
undertaking, attempting to do, or holding oneself out as able to
do, any of these acts.
(k) "Practice as a physician's assistant" means the practice
of medicine with a participating physician under a practice
EMR H03791'25 (H-1) ev86py


agreement.
(l) "Qualified supervisor" means an individual who is a genetic
counselor and who holds a license under this part other than a
temporary or limited license.
(m) "Task force" means the joint task force created in section
17025.
(n) "Temporary licensed genetic counselor" means a genetic
counselor who has been issued a temporary license under this
article.
(2) In addition to the definitions in this part, article 1
contains definitions and principles of construction applicable to
all articles in this code and part 161 contains definitions
applicable to this part.
Sec. 17011. (1) An individual shall not engage in the practice
of medicine or practice as a physician's assistant unless licensed
or otherwise authorized by this article. An individual shall not
engage in teaching or research that requires the practice of
medicine unless the individual is licensed or otherwise authorized
by this article.
(2) Notwithstanding section 16145 or rules promulgated under
that section, the board may grant a license to an individual who
meets the requirements of section 16186 or 17031(2) 17031(2)(a) or
(b) after reviewing the applicant's record of practice, experience,
and credentials and determining that the applicant is competent to
practice medicine.
(3) For individuals applying for licensure under section
16186, the board shall not impose requirements on graduates of
medical schools located outside the United States or Canada that
exceed the requirements imposed on graduates of medical schools
EMR H03791'25 (H-1) ev86py


located in the United States or Canada.
(4) Notwithstanding section 16145 or rules promulgated under
that section, the board may grant a license in accordance with
section 16186 after determining that each of the following
conditions is satisfied:
(a) The applicant has disclosed that a sanction is in force
against him or her the applicant as described in section
16174(2)(b) and considering the reasons for the sanction and the
applicant's record of practice, experience, credentials, and
competence to engage in the practice of medicine, that sanction
should not prevent the applicant from being granted a license in
this state.
(b) The sanction imposed by the other state is not permanent.
(c) The sanction imposed by the other state was not the result
of a patient safety violation.
(d) If the applicant was required by the state that imposed
the sanction to participate in and complete a probationary period
or treatment plan as a condition of the continuation of his or her
the applicant's licensure, the applicant did not complete the
probationary period or treatment plan because the applicant ceased
engaging in the practice of medicine in that state.
(e) As a condition of licensure under this subsection, the
applicant voluntarily agrees to complete a probationary period or
treatment plan, the terms of which are no less stringent than those
imposed by the state that imposed the sanction.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
following words, titles, or letters or a combination thereof, of
the following words, titles, or letters, with or without qualifying
words or phrases, are restricted in use only to those individuals
EMR H03791'25 (H-1) ev86py


authorized under this part to use the terms and in a way prescribed
in this part: "doctor of medicine", "m.d.", "physician's
assistant", and "p.a.". Notwithstanding section 16261, an
individual who was specially trained at an institution of higher
education in this state to assist a physician in the field of
orthopedics and, upon completion of training, received a 2-year
associate of science degree as an orthopedic physician's assistant
before January 1, 1977 may use the title "orthopedic physician's
assistant" whether or not the individual is licensed under this
part.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. 4925 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
EMR H03791'25 (H-1) ev86py